Louisiana, session 2026, HB1170.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:1604.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1604.8. Preference for Louisiana seafood
A. When purchasing seafood, every person acting as purchasing agent for
any agency, board, commission, department, or other instrumentality of the state or
of a parish, municipality, or other unit of local government, shall purchase seafood
which is taken, harvested, or landed in Louisiana, provided the cost of seafood which
is taken, harvested, or landed in this state does not exceed by more than ten percent
the cost of seafood which is obtained from outside of the state.
B. The provisions of this Section shall not apply when sufficient quantities
of seafood which is taken, harvested, or landed in Louisiana are not available.